src/fst/test/gt-norm2-yamls/V-II-mâyâtan_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Verb - mâyâtan -  adsf : # Ordinary VII verb, Wolvengrey VII1 p 393

     mâyâtan+V+II+Ind+3Sg: mâyâtan
     mâyâtan+V+II+Ind+3Pl: mâyâtanwa
     mâyâtan+V+II+Ind+4Sg: mâyâtaniyiw
     mâyâtan+V+II+Ind+4Pl: mâyâtaniyiwa

     PV/kî+mâyâtan+V+II+Ind+3Sg: [kî-mâyâtan]
     PV/kî+mâyâtan+V+II+Ind+3Pl: [kî-mâyâtanwa]
     PV/kî+mâyâtan+V+II+Ind+4Sg: [kî-mâyâtaniyiw]
     PV/kî+mâyâtan+V+II+Ind+4Pl: [kî-mâyâtaniyiwa]
     
     PV/ka+mâyâtan+V+II+Ind+3Sg: [ka-mâyâtan]
     PV/ka+mâyâtan+V+II+Ind+3Pl: [ka-mâyâtanwa]
     PV/ka+mâyâtan+V+II+Ind+4Sg: [ka-mâyâtaniyiw]
     PV/ka+mâyâtan+V+II+Ind+4Pl: [ka-mâyâtaniyiwa]
     
     PV/wî+mâyâtan+V+II+Ind+3Sg: [wî-mâyâtan]
     PV/wî+mâyâtan+V+II+Ind+3Pl: [wî-mâyâtanwa]
     PV/wî+mâyâtan+V+II+Ind+4Sg: [wî-mâyâtaniyiw]
     PV/wî+mâyâtan+V+II+Ind+4Pl: [wî-mâyâtaniyiwa]

     PV/ê+mâyâtan+V+II+Cnj+3Sg: [ê-mâyâtahk]
     PV/ê+mâyâtan+V+II+Cnj+3Pl: [ê-mâyâtahki]
     PV/ê+mâyâtan+V+II+Cnj+4Sg: [ê-mâyâtaniyik]
     PV/ê+mâyâtan+V+II+Cnj+4Pl: [ê-mâyâtaniyiki]

     PV/ê+PV/kî+mâyâtan+V+II+Cnj+3Sg: [ê-kî-mâyâtahk]
     PV/ê+PV/kî+mâyâtan+V+II+Cnj+3Pl: [ê-kî-mâyâtahki]
     PV/ê+PV/kî+mâyâtan+V+II+Cnj+4Sg: [ê-kî-mâyâtaniyik]
     PV/ê+PV/kî+mâyâtan+V+II+Cnj+4Pl: [ê-kî-mâyâtaniyiki]

     mâyâtan+V+II+Fut+Cond+3Sg: mâyâtahki
     mâyâtan+V+II+Fut+Cond+3Pl: mâyâtahkwâwi
     mâyâtan+V+II+Fut+Cond+4Sg: mâyâtaniyiki
     mâyâtan+V+II+Fut+Cond+4Pl: mâyâtaniyikwâwi
